src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/adj-odd_gt-desc.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Odd syllable adjectives belonging to VIELG, CAHKK, MEAHTTUS, BEAKKAN, JOHTIL, GUOHCA, GARAS, LINIS, SUVRRIS, NANUS, LOSSAT, CAVGAT, CIENAL, NJUORAS, DILDDAS, VUOGAS, HEAHKAS, EATTAS, BOAKKAS, GAPPUS, VATTIS, BIEKKUS, LIEKKUS, GUOROS, NUOLUS, GEARGGUS, JIEDNAI, BOARIS, ALLAT, LAGAN, LAGAS

Tests:
  Adj - šealgat: # VIELG
    šealgat+A+Attr: šelges
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen: [šealgada, šealgat]
    šealgat+A+Sg+Ill: šealgadii
    šealgat+A+Sg+Com: [šealgadiin, šealgadiinna]
    šealgat+A+Pl+Com: šealgadiiguin
    šealgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid, šealgadebbuid]
    šealgat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: šealgadit

  Adj - loažžat: # CAHKK
    loažžat+A+Attr: [loažžadis, ložžes]
    loažžat+A+Sg+Gen: [loažžada, loažžat]
    loažžat+A+Sg+Ill: loažžadii
    loažžat+A+Sg+Com: [loažžadiin, loažžadiinna]
    loažžat+A+Pl+Com: loažžadiiguin
    loažžat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [loažžadeappuid, loažžadabbuid, loažžadebbuid]
    loažžat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: loažžadit

  Adj - guoskkatmeahttun: # MEAHTTUS
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Attr: guoskkatmeahttun
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Gen: [guoskkatmeahttun, guoskkatmeahttuma]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Ill: guoskkatmeahttumii
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Sg+Com: [guoskkatmeahttumiin, guoskkatmeahttumiinna]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Pl+Com: guoskkatmeahttumiiguin
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [guoskkatmeahttuseappuid, guoskkatmeahttusabbuid]
    guoskkatmeahttun+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [guoskkatmeahttusit, guoskkatmeahttumit]

  Adj - nevvot: # BEAKKAN
    nevvot+A+Attr: [nevvot,nevvogis]
    nevvot+A+Sg+Gen: [nevvoga, nevvot]
    nevvot+A+Sg+Ill: nevvogii
    nevvot+A+Sg+Com: [nevvogiin, nevvogiinna]
    nevvot+A+Pl+Com: nevvogiiguin
    nevvot+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nevvogeappuid, nevvogebbuid, nevvogabbuid]
    nevvot+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: nevvogit

  Adj - doaibmil: # JOHTIL
    doaibmil+A+Attr: doaibmilis
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Gen: [doaibmila, doaibmil]
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Ill: doaibmilii
    doaibmil+A+Sg+Com: [doaibmiliin, doaibmiliinna]
    doaibmil+A+Pl+Com: doaibmiliiguin
    doaibmil+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [doaibmileappuid, doaibmilebbuid, doaibmilabbuid]
    doaibmil+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: doaibmilit

  Adj - meađmma: # GUOHCA
    meađmma+A+Attr: meađmma
    meađmma+A+Sg+Gen: [meađbmaga, meađbmat, meađmmaga, meađmmat]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Ill: [meađbmagii, meađmmagii]
    meađmma+A+Sg+Com: [meađbmagiin, meađbmagiinna, meađmmagiin, meađmmagiinna]
    meađmma+A+Pl+Com: [meađbmagiiguin, meađmmagiiguin]
    meađmma+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [meađbmageappuid, meađbmagebbuid, meađbmagabbuid, meađmmageappuid, meađmmagebbuid, meađmmagabbuid]
    meađmma+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [meađbmagit, meađmmagit]

  Adj - ceaikkas: # GARAS
    ceaikkas+A+Attr: ceaika
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Gen: [ceaikasa, ceaikas]
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Ill: ceaikasii
    ceaikkas+A+Sg+Com: [ceaikasiin, ceaikasiinna]
    ceaikkas+A+Pl+Com: ceaikasiiguin
    ceaikkas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [ceaikaseappuid, ceaikasabbuid, ceaikasebbuid]
    ceaikkas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ceaikasit

  Adj - dimis: # LINIS
    dimis+A+Attr: dipma
    dimis+A+Sg+Gen: [dipmása, dipmás]
    dimis+A+Sg+Ill: dipmásii
    dimis+A+Sg+Com: [dipmásiin, dipmásiinna]
    dimis+A+Pl+Com: dipmásiiguin
    dimis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [dipmáseappuid, dipmásabbuid, dipmásebbuid]
    dimis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dipmásit

  Adj - suvrris: # SUVRRIS
    suvrris+A+Attr: [suvrra, suvre]
    suvrris+A+Sg+Gen: [suvrása, suvrás, suvrá]
    suvrris+A+Sg+Ill: [suvrásii, suvrái]
    suvrris+A+Sg+Com: [suvrásiin, suvrásiinna, suvráin]
    suvrris+A+Pl+Com: [suvrásiiguin, suvráiguin]
    suvrris+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [suvráseappuid, suvrásabbuid, suvrásebbuid, suvrribuid]
    suvrris+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [suvrásit, suvrrit]

  Adj - nanus: # NANUS
    nanus+A+Attr: [nanu, nana]
    nanus+A+Sg+Gen: [nannosa, nannos]
    nanus+A+Sg+Ill: nannosii
    nanus+A+Sg+Com: [nannosiin, nannosiinna]
    nanus+A+Pl+Com: nannosiiguin
    nanus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nannoseappuid, nannosabbuid, nannosebbuid]
    nanus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [nannosit, nannuseppot]

  Adj - lossat: # LOSSAT
    lossat+A+Attr: [lossa, losses]
    lossat+A+Sg+Gen: [lossada, lossat]
    lossat+A+Sg+Ill: lossadii
    lossat+A+Sg+Com: [lossadiin, lossadiinna]
    lossat+A+Pl+Com: lossadiiguin
    lossat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [lossadeappuid, lossadabbuid, lossadebbuid, losibuid]
    lossat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: lossadit

  Adj - njuolgat: # CAVGAT
    njuolgat+A+Attr: [njuolga, njulges]
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Gen: [njuolgada, njuolgat]
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Ill: njuolgadii
    njuolgat+A+Sg+Com: [njuolgadiin, njuolgadiinna]
    njuolgat+A+Pl+Com: njuolgadiiguin
    njuolgat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [njuolgadeappuid, njuolgadabbuid, njuolgadebbuid, njuolggabuid]
    njuolgat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: njuolgadit

  Adj - čieŋal: # CIENAL
    čieŋal+A+Attr: čiekŋalis
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Gen: [čiekŋala, čiekŋal]
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Ill: čiekŋalii
    čieŋal+A+Sg+Com: [čiekŋaliin, čiekŋaliinna]
    čieŋal+A+Pl+Com: čiekŋaliiguin
    čieŋal+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čiekŋaleappuid, čiekŋalabbuid, čiekŋalebbuid]
    čieŋal+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: čiekŋalit

  Adj - stoaiddas: # NJUORAS
    stoaiddas+A+Attr: [stoaida, stoaiddas]
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Gen: [stoaidasa, stoaidas]
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Ill: stoaidasii
    stoaiddas+A+Sg+Com: [stoaidasiin, stoaidasiinna]
    stoaiddas+A+Pl+Com: stoaidasiiguin
    stoaiddas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [stoaidaseappuid, stoaidasabbuid, stoaidasebbuid]
    stoaiddas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stoaidasit

  Adj - suohtas: # DILDDAS
    suohtas+A+Attr: [suohtasis, suohtas]
    suohtas+A+Sg+Gen: [suohttasa, suohttas]
    suohtas+A+Sg+Ill: suohttasii
    suohtas+A+Sg+Com: [suohttasiin, suohttasiinna]
    suohtas+A+Pl+Com: suohttasiiguin
    suohtas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [suohttaseappuid, suohttasabbuid, suohttasebbuid]
    suohtas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suohttasit

  Adj - vuogas: # VUOGAS
    vuogas+A+Attr: vuogas
    vuogas+A+Sg+Gen: [vuohkkasa, vuohkkas]
    vuogas+A+Sg+Ill: vuohkkasii
    vuogas+A+Sg+Com: [vuohkkasiin, vuohkkasiinna]
    vuogas+A+Pl+Com: vuohkkasiiguin
    vuogas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [vuohkkaseappuid, vuohkkasabbuid, vuohkkasebbuid]
    vuogas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: vuohkkasit

  Adj - duŋggas: # HEAHKAS
    duŋggas+A+Attr: [duŋggasis, duŋga]
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Gen: [duŋgasa, duŋgas]
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Ill: duŋgasii
    duŋggas+A+Sg+Com: [duŋgasiin, duŋgasiinna]
    duŋggas+A+Pl+Com: duŋgasiiguin
    duŋggas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [duŋgaseappuid, duŋgasabbuid, duŋgasebbuid]
    duŋggas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: duŋgasit

  Adj - goavššas: # EATTAS
    goavššas+A+Attr: goavššasis
    goavššas+A+Sg+Gen: [goakšasa, goakšas]
    goavššas+A+Sg+Ill: goakšasii
    goavššas+A+Sg+Com: [goakšasiin, goakšasiinna]
    goavššas+A+Pl+Com: goakšasiiguin
    goavššas+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [goakšaseappuid, goakšasabbuid, goakšasebbuid]
    goavššas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goakšasit

  Adj - boahkis: # BOAKKAS
    boahkis+A+Sg+Gen: [boahkkása, boahkkás]
    boahkis+A+Sg+Ill: boahkkásii
    boahkis+A+Sg+Com: [boahkkásiin, boahkkásiinna]
    boahkis+A+Pl+Com: boahkkásiiguin
    boahkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [boahkkáseappuid, boahkkásabbuid, boahkkásebbuid]
    boahkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: boahkkásit

  Adj - gearpmus: # GAPPUS
    gearpmus+A+Attr: gearpmus
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Gen: [gerbmosa, gerbmos]
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Ill: gerbmosii
    gearpmus+A+Sg+Com: [gerbmosiin, gerbmosiinna]
    gearpmus+A+Pl+Com: gerbmosiiguin
    gearpmus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gerbmoseappuid, gerbmosabbuid, gerbmosebbuid]
    gearpmus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gerbmosit

  Adj - lámis: # VATTIS
    lámis+A+Attr: [lámes, lámisis, lámis]
    lámis+A+Sg+Gen: [lápmása, lápmás]
    lámis+A+Sg+Ill: lápmásii
    lámis+A+Sg+Com: [lápmásiin, lápmásiinna]
    lámis+A+Pl+Com: lápmásiiguin
    lámis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [lápmáseappuid, lápmásabbuid, lápmásebbuid]
    lámis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: lápmásit

  Adj - biekkus: # BIEKKUS
    biekkus+A+Attr: biekkusis
    biekkus+A+Sg+Gen: [biggosa, biggos]
    biekkus+A+Sg+Ill: biggosii
    biekkus+A+Sg+Com: [biggosiin, biggosiinna]
    biekkus+A+Pl+Com: biggosiiguin
    biekkus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [biggoseappuid, biggosabbuid, biggosebbuid]
    biekkus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: biggosit

  Adj - roattus: # LIEKKUS
    roattus+A+Attr: [roattusis, roattus]
    roattus+A+Sg+Gen: [roddosa, roddos]
    roattus+A+Sg+Ill: roddosii
    roattus+A+Sg+Com: [roddosiin, roddosiinna]
    roattus+A+Pl+Com: roddosiiguin
    roattus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [roddoseappuid, roddosabbuid, roddosebbuid]
    roattus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roddosit

  Adj - guoros: # GUOROS
    guoros+A+Attr: guoros
    guoros+A+Sg+Gen: [gurrosa, gurros]
    guoros+A+Sg+Ill: gurrosii
    guoros+A+Sg+Com: [gurrosiin, gurrosiinna]
    guoros+A+Pl+Com: gurrosiiguin
    guoros+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gurroseappuid, gurrosabbuid, gurrosebbuid]
    guoros+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gurrosit

  Adj - ruojus: # NUOLUS
    ruojus+A+Attr: [ruojus, ruojos]
    ruojus+A+Sg+Gen: [rudjosa, rudjos]
    ruojus+A+Sg+Ill: rudjosii
    ruojus+A+Sg+Com: [rudjosiin, rudjosiinna]
    ruojus+A+Pl+Com: rudjosiiguin
    ruojus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [rudjoseappuid, rudjosabbuid, rudjosebbuid]
    ruojus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rudjosit

  Adj - gearggus: # GEARGGUS
    gearggus+A+Attr: gearggos
    gearggus+A+Sg+Gen: [gergosa, gergos]
    gearggus+A+Sg+Ill: gergosii
    gearggus+A+Sg+Com: [gergosiin, gergosiinna]
    gearggus+A+Pl+Com: gergosiiguin
    gearggus+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [gergoseappuid, gergosabbuid, gergosebbuid]
    gearggus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gergosit

  Adj - šihttui: # JIEDNAI
    šihttui+A+Attr: šihttos
    šihttui+A+Sg+Gen: šihtto
    šihttui+A+Sg+Ill: šihttui
    šihttui+A+Sg+Com: šihttuin
    šihttui+A+Pl+Com: šihttuiguin
    šihttui+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: šihttobuid
    šihttui+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [šihttojit, šihttot]

  Adj - coagis: # BOARIS
    coagis+A+Attr: coages
    coagis+A+Sg+Gen: [coahkása, coahkás]
    coagis+A+Sg+Ill: coahkásii
    coagis+A+Sg+Com: [coahkásiin, coahkásiinna]
    coagis+A+Pl+Com: coahkásiiguin
    coagis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [coahkáseappuid, coahkásabbuid, coahkásebbuid]
    coagis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: coahkásit

  Adj - govdat: # ALLAT
    govdat+A+Attr: [govda, govdes]
    govdat+A+Sg+Gen: [govdaga, govdada, govdat]
    govdat+A+Sg+Ill: [govdagii, govdadii]
    govdat+A+Sg+Com: [govdagiin, govdadiin, govdagiinna, govdadiinna]
    govdat+A+Pl+Com: [govdagiiguin, govdadiiguin]
    govdat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [govddibuid, govdadabbuid, govdadeappuid, govdadebbuid]
    govdat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [govdagit, govdadit]
  
  Adj - guvrelágan: # LAGAN
    guvrelágan+A+Attr:   [guvrelagan, guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Gen: [guvrelagana, guvrelágana, guvrelágána, guvrelagan, guvrelágan, guvrelágán]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Ill: [guvrelaganii, guvreláganii, guvrelágánii]
    guvrelágan+A+Sg+Com: [guvreláganiin, guvrelágániin, guvrelaganiin, guvreláganiinna, guvrelágániinna, guvrelaganiinna]
    guvrelágan+v1+A+Sg+Com: [guvreláganiin, guvreláganiinna]
    guvrelágan+A+Pl+Com: [guvrelaganiiguin, guvreláganiiguin, guvrelágániiguin]

  Adj - goahccelágaš: # LAGAS
    goahccelágaš+A+Attr:   [goahccelagaš, goahccelágaš, goahccelágáš]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Gen: [goahccelagaža, goahccelágaža, goahccelágáža, goahccelagaš, goahccelágaš, goahccelágáš]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Ill: [goahccelagažii, goahccelágažii, goahccelágážii]
    goahccelágaš+A+Sg+Com: [goahccelágažiin, goahccelágážiin, goahccelagažiin, goahccelágažiinna, goahccelágážiinna, goahccelagažiinna]
    goahccelágaš+v1+A+Sg+Com: [goahccelágažiin, goahccelágažiinna]
    goahccelágaš+A+Pl+Com: [goahccelagažiiguin, goahccelágažiiguin, goahccelágážiiguin]
